California, session 20252026, SB740.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 13912 of the Water Code is amended to read:13912. (a) A municipal wastewater agency may do any of the following:(1) To the extent permitted by federal law, authorize the discharge of stormwater or dry weather runoff captured at industrial and commercial sites to the wastewater collection or treatment system subject to any requirements that may be imposed by the municipal wastewater agency or public agency that owns and operates the tributary collection system.(2) In order to carry out the powers granted, and the purposes established, under this chapter, exercise any of the powers otherwise granted to it by law, including, but not limited to, enforcing compliance with local, state, and federal water quality requirements through the implementation of the municipal wastewater agency’s industrial pretreatment programs and ensuring that the project or program is consistent with local watershed priorities, obligations, and circumstances.(3) Levy taxes, fees, and charges consistent with the municipal wastewater agency’s existing authority in order to fund projects undertaken pursuant to this chapter.(b) The exercise of any new authority granted under this chapter is subject to and shall comply with the Cortese-Knox-Hertzberg Local Government Reorganization Act of 2000 (Division 3 (commencing with Section 56000) of Title 5 of the Government Code).(c) (1) If, after January 1, 2022, If a municipal wastewater agency enters into a new agreement or amends an agreement pursuant to this chapter, the agency shall, within 30 40 days after the effective date of the new agreement or amendment, file a copy of the agreement or amendment with the local agency formation commission in each county where any part of the municipal wastewater agency’s territory is located.(2) The local agency formation commission’s approval of an agreement or an amendment to an agreement as described in paragraph (1) shall not be required, except as required by subdivision (b).